bg: Гравиера Наксос
el: Γραβιέρα Νάξου, Graviera Naxou
fr: Graviera de Naxos

de: Manouri
el: Μανούρι, Manouri
fr: Manouri

en: Austrian cheeses
fr: Fromages autrichiens
hr: Austrijski sirevi
lt: Austriški sūriai, sūriai iš Austrijos

en: Belgian cheeses
es: Quesos de Bélgica, Quesos Belgas
fr: Fromages belges, Fromages de Belgique
hr: Belgijski sirevi
lt: Belgiški sūriai, sūriai iš Belgijos

bg: Ерве
fr: Fromage de Herve

en: Croatian cheeses, Cheeses from Croatia
fr: Fromages de Croatie
hr: Hrvatski sirevi
lt: Kroatiški sūriai, sūriai iš Kroatijos

en: Czech cheeses
lt: Čekiški sūriai, sūriai iš Čekijos

en: Danish cheeses
bg: Датски сирена
ca: Formatges danesos
de: Dänischer Käse
es: Quesos daneses
hr: Danski sirevi
it: Formaggi danesi
lt: Daniški sūriai, sūriai iš Danijos

en: Havarti, Havarti cheeses
xx: Havarti
bg: Хаварти
ca: Havarti
da: Havarti
de: Havarti
es: Havarti, Queso Havarti
et: Havarti
eu: Havarti
fi: Havarti
fr: Havarti
hr: Havarti
id: Havarti
is: Havarti
it: Havarti
ja: ハバーティ
jv: Havarti
ko: 하바르티
nb: Havarti
nl: Havarti
nn: Havarti
pl: Havarti
ro: Havarti
ru: Хаварти
tr: Havarti
zh: 哈瓦蒂芝士

bg: Данбо
da: Danbo
es: Queso Danbo, Danbo

en: French cheeses, cheeses from France
bg: Френски сирена
ca: Formatges francesos
de: Französischer Käse, Käse aus Frankreich
es: Quesos Franceses, Quesos De Francia
fi: Ranskalaiset juustot
fr: Fromages de France, Fromages français
he: גבינות צרפתיות
hr: Francuski sirevi
hu: Francia sajtok
it: Formaggi francesi
lt: Prancūziški sūriai, sūriai iš Prancūzijos
nl: Franse kazen
pl: Sery francuskie, sery z Francji
pt: Queijos franceses, queijos da França
ru: Французские сыры
zh: 法国奶酪

en: Valençay cheese
fr: Valençay
hr: Valençay sir
lt: Ožkos sūriai
nl: Velençay kaas

en: Cabécous
xx: Cabécous
fr: Cabécous, Cabécou
hr: Cabécous
nl: Cabécou

en: Selles-sur-Cher
xx: Selles-sur-Cher

en: Cheeses from Corsica
de: Käse aus Korsika
fr: Fromages de Corse
hr: Sirevi s Korzike
hu: Korzikai sajtok
nl: Kazen uit Corsica, Corsicaanse kazen

en: Abondance
fr: Abondance
zh: 阿邦当斯奶酪

en: Beaufort
fr: Beaufort

en: Causses blue cheeses, Causses blue cheese from cow's milk
fr: Bleu des Causses

en: Brie de Meaux cheeses, Brie de Meaux cheese from cow's milk
fr: Brie de Meaux, Bries de Meaux

en: Brie de Melun, Brie de Melun cheeses, Brie de Melun cheese from cow's milk
fr: Brie de Melun, Bries de Melun